Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.1] Continuing competence. (a)
Beginning with the December 31, 2016, renewal, each licensed physical therapist
shall be required to obtain at least thirty units of approved continuing
competence units in each two-year license renewal period, where one continuing
competence unit is equivalent to at least fifty minutes of classroom or hands-on
instruction.

(b) For first-time license renewals, if the
initial license was issued less than twelve months prior to the renewal date,
no continuing competence units will be required for the first renewal period.
If the initial license was issued more than twelve months prior to the renewal
date, the licensee shall be required to obtain fifteen units of approved
continuing competence units for the first renewal period.

(c) At the time of renewal, each licensee
shall submit evidence of completing the required continuing competence units to
the board or agency designated by the board. Failure to present evidence of
compliance at the time of renewal shall constitute a forfeiture of the license,
which may be restored only upon written application and payment to the board of
a restoration fee and proof of compliance with continued competence
requirements.

(d) The board may randomly audit a licensee's
continuing competence units, and may establish guidelines for random audits in
rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91. [L 2013, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next